North Carolina, session 2025, SB575.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-173. Failure to yield right-of-way to pedestrian resulting in serious injury.
Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law providing greater
punishment, any person who fails to yield the right-of-way to a pedestrian as required by this
Article and inflicts serious injury to that pedestrian is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-88.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-88.1. Driver education.
…
(e) The Division shall develop a training course, training courses or identify an existing
training course, courses to educate individuals on both of the following:
(1) the The safe operation of a motor vehicle within a "highway work zone," as
defined in G.S. 20-141.
(2) When a motor vehicle operator is required to yield the right-of-way to a
pedestrian.
(f) With respect to the any training course developed or identified pursuant to this
subsection, subsection (e) of this section the Division shall do both of the following:
(1) Ensure the training course is accessible to the public both in-person and on its
website.
(2) Develop a method for a person to demonstrate successful completion of the
training course."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 115C-215 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-215. Administration of driver education program by the Department of Public
Instruction.
*S575-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(b) The driver education curriculum shall include the following:
…
(6) The highway work zone Any training course developed by the Division of
Motor Vehicles pursuant to G.S. 20-88.1.G.S. 20-88.1(e).
…."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 4. The Division of Motor Vehicles of the North Carolina Department of
Transportation, in consultation with the Department of Public Instruction, shall study and provide
a plan for improving the driver education curriculum with respect to its instruction on pedestrian
safety. The Division shall report its findings of this study, including any legislative
recommendations, to the North Carolina General Assembly, the chairs of the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee, the chairs of the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee,
and the Fiscal Research Division no later than January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 575-First Edition